test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosj_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховандархынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховандархыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховандархыдоʼ    
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcSg3: хованӈгабяв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcSg3: хованӈгабяр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcSg3: хованӈгабяда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcSg3: хованӈгабямиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcSg3: хованӈгабяриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcSg3: хованӈгабядиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcSg3: хованӈгабяваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcSg3: хованӈгабяраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcSg3: хованӈгабядоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcDu3: хованӈгабяхаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcPl3: хованӈгабин
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcPl3: хованӈгабид
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcPl3: хованӈгабида
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcPl3: хованӈгабиниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcPl3: хованӈгабидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcPl3: хованӈгабидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcPl3: хованӈгабинаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcPl3: хованӈгабидаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcPl3: хованӈгабидоʼ 
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcSg3: хорхавэв
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcSg3: хорхавэр
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcSg3: хорхавэда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcSg3: хорхавэмиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcSg3: хорхавэриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcSg3: хорхавэдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcSg3: хорхавэваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcSg3: хорхавэраˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcSg3: хорхавэдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcDu3: хорхавэхэюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcPl3: хорхавын
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcPl3: хорхавыд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcPl3: хорхавыда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcPl3: хорхавыниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcPl3: хорхавыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcPl3: хорхавыдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcPl3: хорхавынаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcPl3: хорхавыдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcPl3: хорхавыдоʼ   
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcSg3: ховнав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcSg3: ховнар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcSg3: ховнада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcSg3: ховнамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcSg3: ховнариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcSg3: ховнадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcSg3: ховнаваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcSg3: ховнараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcSg3: ховнадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcDu3: ховнахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcDu3: ховнахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcDu3: ховнахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcDu3: ховнахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcDu3: ховнахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcDu3: ховнахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcDu3: ховнахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcDu3: ховнахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcDu3: ховнахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg1+OcPl3: ховнан
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg2+OcPl3: ховнад
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScSg3+OcPl3: ховнада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu1+OcPl3: ховнаниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu2+OcPl3: ховнадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScDu3+OcPl3: ховнадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl1+OcPl3: ховнанаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl2+OcPl3: ховнадаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/rep+ScPl3+OcPl3: ховнадоʼ                        
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcSg3: хорвав
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcSg3: хорвар
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcSg3: хорвада
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcSg3: хорвамиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcSg3: хорвариʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcSg3: хорвадиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcSg3: хорваваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcSg3: хорвараˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcSg3: хорвадоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcDu3: хорвахаюн
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcDu3: хорвахаюд
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcDu3: хорвахаюда
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcDu3: хорвахаюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcDu3: хорвахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcDu3: хорвахаюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcDu3: хорвахаюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcDu3: хорвахаюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcDu3: хорвахаюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcPl3: хорбин
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcPl3: хорбид
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcPl3: хорбида
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcPl3: хорбиниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcPl3: хорбидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcPl3: хорбидиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcPl3: хорбинаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcPl3: хорбидаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcPl3: хорбидоʼ      
     хось+V+TV+InfImprf: хова  
     хось+V+TV+InfPrf: хоˮма  
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf: хона
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf: ховы
     хось+V+TV+PrcFut: [ховнда, хованда]
     хось+V+TV+PrcNeg: ховдавэй
     хось+V+TV+Ger: хось 
     хось+V+TV+GerFin: хованзь      
     хось+V+TV+Subord+Abs: хобˮ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+Abs: ховоӈгад
     хось+V+TV+ConNeg: хоˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: хоӈгуˮ
          
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxSg1: [хобˮнан, хобаˮн]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxSg2: [хобˮнанд, хобат]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxSg3: [хобˮнанда, хобата] 
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxDu1: [хобˮнаниʼ, хобаˮниʼ]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxDu2: [хобˮнандиʼ, хобаˮтиʼ]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxDu3: [хобˮнандиʼ, хобаˮтиʼ]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxPl1: [хобˮнанаˮ, хобаˮнаˮ]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxPl2: [хобˮнандаˮ, хобатаˮ]
     хось+V+TV+Subord+PxPl3: [хобˮнандоʼ, хобатоʼ]       
                
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg1: [ховоӈгадан, ховоӈгадани] #ховоӈгаданиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg2: ховоӈгаданд
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxSg3: ховоӈгаданда
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu1: ховоӈгаданиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu2: ховоӈгадандиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxDu3: ховоӈгадандиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl1: ховоӈгаданаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl2: ховоӈгадандаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Evas+PxPl3: ховоӈгадандоʼ
     
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хоӈгудмʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хоӈгун
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хоӈгу
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хоӈгуниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хоӈгудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хоӈгухуʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хоӈгуваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хоӈгудаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хоӈгуˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: хоӈгув
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: хоӈгур
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: хоӈгуда
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: хоӈгумиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: хоӈгуриʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: хоӈгудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: хоӈгуваˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: хоӈгураˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: хоӈгудоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюн
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюд
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюда
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюнаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдоʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: хоӈгун
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: хоӈгуд
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: хоӈгуда
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: хоӈгуниʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: хоӈгудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: хоӈгудиʼ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: хоӈгунаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: хоӈгудаˮ
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: хоӈгудоʼ 
     
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хоӈгудамзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хоӈгунась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хоӈгусь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хоӈгунинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хоӈгудинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хоӈгухунзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хоӈгуваць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хоӈгудаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хоӈгуць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: хоӈгувась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: хоӈгурась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: хоӈгудась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: хоӈгуминзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: хоӈгуринзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: хоӈгудинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: хоӈгуваць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: хоӈгураць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: хоӈгудонзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюнась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюнаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: хоӈгухуюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: хоӈгунась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: хоӈгудась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: хоӈгудась
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: хоӈгунинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: хоӈгудинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: хоӈгудинзь
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: хоӈгунаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: хоӈгудаць
     хось+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: хоӈгудонзь
